hunspell/cy/cy.aff
SFX O Y 408
SFX O   o           af         o
SFX O   o           i          o
SFX O   o           i'i        o
SFX O   o           i'u        o
SFX O   o           i'ch       o
SFX O   o           i'n        o
SFX O   o           i'r        o
SFX O   o           a          o
SFX O   o           a'i        o
SFX O   o           a'u        o
SFX O   o           a'ch       o
SFX O   o           a'n        o
SFX O   o           a'r        o
SFX O   o           wn         o
SFX O   o           wch        o
SFX O   o           ant        o
SFX O   o           ir         o
SFX O   o           it         o
SFX O   o           et         o
SFX O   o           ai         o
SFX O   o           ai'i       o
SFX O   o           ai'u       o
SFX O   o           ai'ch      o
SFX O   o           ai'n       o
SFX O   o           ai'r       o
SFX O   o           em         o
SFX O   o           ech        o
SFX O   o           ent        o
SFX O   o           id         o
SFX O   o           ais        o
SFX O   o           aist       o
SFX O   o           odd        o
SFX O   o           som        o
SFX O   o           soch       o
SFX O   o           sant       o
SFX O   o           wyd        o
SFX O   o           swn        o
SFX O   o           sit        o
SFX O   o           set        o
SFX O   o           sai        o
SFX O   o           sai'i      o
SFX O   o           sai'u      o
SFX O   o           sai'ch     o
SFX O   o           sai'n      o
SFX O   o           sai'r      o
SFX O   o           sem        o
SFX O   o           sech       o
SFX O   o           sent       o
SFX O   o           sid        o
SFX O   o           ed         o
SFX O   o           wyf        o
SFX O   o           ych        o
SFX O   o           o          o
SFX O   o           o'i        o
SFX O   o           o'u        o
SFX O   o           o'ch       o
SFX O   o           o'n        o
SFX O   o           o'r        o
SFX O   o           om         o
SFX O   o           och        o
SFX O   o           ont        o
SFX O   o           er         o
SFX O   o           es         o
SFX O   o           est        o
SFX O   o           ith        o
SFX O   o           iff        o
SFX O   o           on         o
SFX O   o           an         o
SFX O   u           af         u
SFX O   u           i          u
SFX O   u           i'i        u
SFX O   u           i'u        u
SFX O   u           i'ch       u
SFX O   u           i'n        u
SFX O   u           i'r        u
SFX O   u           a          u
SFX O   u           a'i        u
SFX O   u           a'u        u
SFX O   u           a'ch       u
SFX O   u           a'n        u
SFX O   u           a'r        u
SFX O   u           wn         u
SFX O   u           wch        u
SFX O   u           ant        u
SFX O   u           ir         u
SFX O   u           it         u
SFX O   u           et         u
SFX O   u           ai         u
SFX O   u           ai'i       u
SFX O   u           ai'u       u
SFX O   u           ai'ch      u
SFX O   u           ai'n       u
SFX O   u           ai'r       u
SFX O   u           em         u
SFX O   u           ech        u
SFX O   u           ent        u
SFX O   u           id         u
SFX O   u           ais        u
SFX O   u           aist       u
SFX O   u           odd        u
SFX O   u           som        u
SFX O   u           soch       u
SFX O   u           sant       u
SFX O   u           wyd        u
SFX O   u           swn        u
SFX O   u           sit        u
SFX O   u           set        u
SFX O   u           sai        u
SFX O   u           sai'i      u
SFX O   u           sai'u      u
SFX O   u           sai'ch     u
SFX O   u           sai'n      u
SFX O   u           sai'r      u
SFX O   u           sem        u
SFX O   u           sech       u
SFX O   u           sent       u
SFX O   u           sid        u
SFX O   u           ed         u
SFX O   u           wyf        u
SFX O   u           ych        u
SFX O   u           o          u
SFX O   u           o'i        u
SFX O   u           o'u        u
SFX O   u           o'ch       u
SFX O   u           o'n        u
SFX O   u           o'r        u
SFX O   u           om         u
SFX O   u           och        u
SFX O   u           ont        u
SFX O   u           er         u
SFX O   u           es         u
SFX O   u           est        u
SFX O   u           ith        u
SFX O   u           iff        u
SFX O   u           on         u
SFX O   u           an         u
SFX O   a           af         a
SFX O   a           i          a
SFX O   a           i'i        a
SFX O   a           i'u        a
SFX O   a           i'ch       a
SFX O   a           i'n        a
SFX O   a           i'r        a
SFX O   a           a          a
SFX O   a           a'i        a
SFX O   a           a'u        a
SFX O   a           a'ch       a
SFX O   a           a'n        a
SFX O   a           a'r        a
SFX O   a           wn         a
SFX O   a           wch        a
SFX O   a           ant        a
SFX O   a           ir         a
SFX O   a           it         a
SFX O   a           et         a
SFX O   a           ai         a
SFX O   a           ai'i       a
SFX O   a           ai'u       a
SFX O   a           ai'ch      a
SFX O   a           ai'n       a
SFX O   a           ai'r       a
SFX O   a           em         a
SFX O   a           ech        a
SFX O   a           ent        a
SFX O   a           id         a
SFX O   a           ais        a
SFX O   a           aist       a
SFX O   a           odd        a
SFX O   a           som        a
SFX O   a           soch       a
SFX O   a           sant       a
SFX O   a           wyd        a
SFX O   a           swn        a
SFX O   a           sit        a
SFX O   a           set        a
SFX O   a           sai        a
SFX O   a           sai'i      a
SFX O   a           sai'u      a
SFX O   a           sai'ch     a
SFX O   a           sai'n      a
SFX O   a           sai'r      a
SFX O   a           sem        a
SFX O   a           sech       a
SFX O   a           sent       a
SFX O   a           sid        a
SFX O   a           ed         a
SFX O   a           wyf        a
SFX O   a           ych        a
SFX O   a           o          a
SFX O   a           o'i        a
SFX O   a           o'u        a
SFX O   a           o'ch       a
SFX O   a           o'n        a
SFX O   a           o'r        a
SFX O   a           om         a
SFX O   a           och        a
SFX O   a           ont        a
SFX O   a           er         a
SFX O   a           es         a
SFX O   a           est        a
SFX O   a           ith        a
SFX O   a           iff        a
SFX O   a           on         a
SFX O   a           an         a
SFX O   d           af         d
SFX O   d           i          d
SFX O   d           i'i        d
SFX O   d           i'u        d
SFX O   d           i'ch       d
SFX O   d           i'n        d
SFX O   d           i'r        d
SFX O   d           a          d
SFX O   d           a'i        d
SFX O   d           a'u        d
SFX O   d           a'ch       d
SFX O   d           a'n        d
SFX O   d           a'r        d
SFX O   d           wn         d
SFX O   d           wch        d
SFX O   d           ant        d
SFX O   d           ir         d
SFX O   d           it         d
SFX O   d           et         d
SFX O   d           ai         d
SFX O   d           ai'i       d
SFX O   d           ai'u       d
SFX O   d           ai'ch      d
SFX O   d           ai'n       d
SFX O   d           ai'r       d
SFX O   d           em         d
SFX O   d           ech        d
SFX O   d           ent        d
SFX O   d           id         d
SFX O   d           ais        d
SFX O   d           aist       d
SFX O   d           odd        d
SFX O   d           som        d
SFX O   d           soch       d
SFX O   d           sant       d
SFX O   d           wyd        d
SFX O   d           swn        d
SFX O   d           sit        d
